Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.890

Collegiate license plate fund—Scholarships.

A collegiate license plate fund is established in the custody of the state treasurer for each college or university with a collegiate license plate program approved by the department of licensing under RCW 46.18.225. All receipts from collegiate license plates authorized under RCW 46.17.220 must be deposited in the appropriate local college or university nonappropriated, nonallotted fund. Expenditures from the funds may be used only for student scholarships. Only the president of the college or university or the president's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.

[ 2010 c 161 s 1102; 1994 c 194 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.